Massachusetts, session 194th, S178.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 49 of chapter 23G of the General Laws is hereby amended by
adding the following subsections:-
(e) The agency shall seek to direct not less than 25 percent of the financing provided by
all of its programs, and not less than 50 percent of its growth capital division programs, to
microbusinesses.
(f) The agency shall seek to direct not less than 50 percent of the financing provided by
all of its programs, and all of the financing provided by its growth capital division, to small
businesses.
(f) The agency shall seek to direct not less than 67 percent of the financing provided by
all of its programs to socially or economically disadvantaged businesses, which may include, but
shall not be limited to, minority-owned, women-owned, worker-owned, veteran-owned or
immigrant-owned small businesses, that have historically faced obstacles to accessing capital.
of 2

SECTION 2. Chapter 23A of the General Laws, is hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
Section 70: Directing Equitable Assistance to Micro Businesses and Small Businesses
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, unless otherwise specified,
and whenever possible, the executive office of economic development shall establish policies
and procedures to prioritize socially or economically disadvantaged businesses, which may
include, but shall not be limited to, minority-owned, women-owned, veteran-owned or
immigrant-owned microbusinesses and small businesses, that have historically faced obstacles to
accessing capital in the awarding of all grants, loans, and other assistance, provided further that
those policies and procedures shall ensure that:
(1) Not less than 25 percent of all grants, loans, and other financial assistance provided
by all programs across the agency shall be awarded to microbusinesses;
(2) Not less than 50 percent of all grants, loans, and other forms of financial assistance
provided by all programs across the agency shall be awarded to small businesses;
(3) Not less than 67 percent of all grants, loans, and other forms of financial assistance
shall be awarded to socially or economically disadvantaged businesses, which may include, but
shall not be limited to, minority-owned, women-owned, worker-owned, veteran-owned or
immigrant-owned small businesses, that have historically faced obstacles to accessing capital.
of 2